Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 1 General Provisions
21-1-702. Grievances.

The Office of Personnel Management shall establish a procedure for the filing, hearing, adjudication, and appeal of grievances by state agencies.

An employee of a state agency may file a grievance under this subchapter if his or her termination or suspension from employment was inconsistent with the terminating or suspending state agency's disciplinary policy.

At the hearing on or appeal of the grievance filed under this subchapter, the sole issue for the trier of fact shall be whether the state agency's decision concerning termination or suspension was consistent with the state agency's disciplinary policy.

The procedure established under subsection (a) of this section shall provide without limitation that an employee be afforded a hearing within fifteen (15) business days of the filing of his or her appeal if the employee alleges that he or she was terminated by a state agency for the following actions under § 21-1-603:

Communicating in good faith to an appropriate authority:

The existence of waste of public funds, property, or manpower, including federal funds, property, or manpower administered or controlled by a public employer; or

A violation or suspected violation of a law or rule adopted under the law of this state or a political subdivision of the state;

Participating or giving information in an investigation, hearing, court proceeding, legislative or other inquiry, or in any form of administrative review;

Objecting to or refusing to carry out a directive that the employee reasonably believes violates a law or rule adopted under the authority of the laws of the state or a political subdivision of the state; or

Reporting a loss of public funds under § 25-1-124.

A hearing under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section shall take place before the occurrence of a state agency hearing pursuant to the grievance filed by the person.

(a)An employee requesting a hearing under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section shall submit with his or her request for a hearing evidence that he or she committed one (1) of the actions under subdivisions (c)(1)(A)(i)-(iv) of this section.

Evidence under this subdivision (c)(1)(C)(i) that is confidential under § 21-1-607 or other provisions of law shall remain confidential when submitted in support of a request for a hearing or otherwise utilized in the appeal of the grievance decision.

If the person fails to demonstrate that he or she committed one (1) of the actions under subdivisions (c)(1)(A)(i)-(iv) of this section, the office shall not schedule a hearing under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section.

If the employee demonstrates at the hearing that a reasonable person would conclude that the state agency terminated the employee as a result of the employee's activities under subdivisions (c)(1)(A)(i)-(iv) of this section, the employee shall be:

Reinstated to his or her position until the conclusion of the grievance review procedure under this section; or

Reinstated to his or her position and placed on administrative leave until the conclusion of the grievance review procedure under this section.

An employee filing an appeal of a grievance decision under this section does not waive his or her right to file a claim under the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act, § 21-1-601 et seq.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (b) and (c) and designated the former provisions as (a).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning appeals of grievance decisions, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 1054, § 1, effective July 24, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 2013, No. 1448, § 1; 2017, No. 791, § 2.

For current law, see §21-1-702.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The amendment of this section by Acts 2019, No. 910, is superseded by the repeal of this section by Acts 2019, No. 1054.Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3490, amended subdivision (c)(2)(A)(ii) to read as follows: “(ii) The mediator shall report within ten (10) business days of the nonbinding mediation his or her suggested resolution to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6122, amended subdivision (c)(2)(A)(ii) to read as follows: “(ii) The mediator shall report within ten (10) business days of the nonbinding mediation his or her suggested resolution to the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning nonbinding mediation, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 1054, § 1, effective July 24, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 2013, No. 1448, § 1; 2017, No. 791, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3490, 6122.

Am. Jur. 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Pub. Off., § 123 et seq.

C.J.S. 67 C.J.S., Officers, § 70 et seq.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Provisions of this subchapter concerning bonds may be affected by subchapter 7 of this chapter. Subchapter 7 of this chapter establishes a Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Program for state, county, municipal, and school district officials and employees.

Cross References. Fees for issuing commissions, §21-6-202.

Form of oath, Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 20.

Recording in recorder's office, §14-15-402.

Sureties on official bonds, Ark. Const. Amend. 4.

Effective Dates. Acts 1845, § 5, p. 61: effective on passage.

Acts 1875, No. 77, § 53: effective on passage.

Acts 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 21, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1881, No. 40, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1883, No. 50, § 4: effective on passage.

Acts 1899, No. 14, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1927, No. 85, § 5: effective on passage.

Acts 1937, No. 329, § 10: Jan. 1, 1939.

Acts 1939, No. 89, § 3: Feb. 15, 1939.

Acts 1945, No. 3, § 4: approved Jan. 17, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “That because many persons of this State are now in the armed forces of the United States and are now located in the various States of the United States, as well as in many foreign countries, and are unable to comply with the technical requirements of the Arkansas laws as to the taking of oaths of office, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1945, No. 5, § 4: approved Jan. 26, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, many officers and officers-elect of the State and county offices in the State of Arkansas are beyond the boundaries of this State and engaged in the military service of the United States and great confusion and difficulty exists on account of the uncertainty as to how the official oath may be taken by such persons and when their bonds may be executed and filed, and whereas it is necessary for the orderly carrying on of the State and County Governments and the preservation of the public peace, health and safety that there be no uncertainty regarding the validity of the official oaths and bonds of such officers, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1977, No. 531, § 2: Mar. 18, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it would greatly facilitate the requirements that various public officials take an oath of office for their respective office if the Secretary of State and/or his official designee had the ability and authority to administer said oaths, that it is essential to the proper and efficient administration of state government that said authority designed to grant that authority and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 1023, § 5: Apr. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1186 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1448, § 1; 2019, No. 1054, § 1.

21-1-703. [Repealed.]

21-1-207. Public employees.

21-1-306. Emergency interim successors for local officers.

21-1-610. Reward to state employee when communication of waste or violation results in savings of state funds — Definitions.

21-1-704. [Repealed.]